Utah statutes.
62A-15-204.   Court order to attend substance abuse school -- Assessments.
(1)  In addition to any other disposition ordered by the juvenile court
pursuant to Section 78A-6-117, the court may order a juvenile and his parents
or legal guardians to attend a teen substance abuse school, and order payment
of an assessment in addition to any other fine imposed.
(2)  All assessments collected shall be forwarded to the county treasurer of
the county where the juvenile resides, to be used exclusively for the
operation of a teen substance abuse program.
